Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 22 Appeals in Criminal Cases

12-22-1.
Right to appeal from district to superior court.

Every person aggrieved by the sentence of the district court for any offense other than a violation may, within five (5) days after the sentence, appeal from the district court to the superior court for the county in which the division of the district court is situated, by claiming an appeal in the court or in the office of the clerk of the court appealed from or at any of the penal institutions of the state, before any justice of the supreme or superior court, or before a justice or clerk of the court appealed from, or before any of the persons authorized to take bail at the penal institutions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 461; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 29; P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 5.

12-22-1.1.
Review by supreme court — Violations.

Every person aggrieved by the imposition of a fine by the district court upon the finding of a violation may, within twenty (20) days after entry of judgment imposing the fine, petition the supreme court of the state of Rhode Island for a writ of certiorari to review any errors involved. The petition for a writ of certiorari shall set forth the errors claimed. Upon the filing of a petition with the clerk of the supreme court, the supreme court may, if it sees fit, issue its writ of certiorari to the district court to certify to the supreme court the record of the proceedings in the case together with any transcript of the proceedings furnished by the petitioner at his expense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 6.

12-22-2.
Notation as to time of claiming appeal — Transmission of claim.

If an appeal is claimed in the court or in the office of the clerk of the court appealed from, the claim and the time when made shall be noted upon the complaint, and also upon the mittimus, if any, issued upon the sentence appealed from; and if claimed at any other place, it shall be claimed in writing, and the person before whom it is claimed shall note upon the claim of appeal the time when made and shall immediately transmit the claim to the court which passed the sentence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 462; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-2

.

12-22-3.
Fixing recognizance required for discharge pending appeal.

When a district court shall sentence a person for an offense, it shall fix the amount of the recognizance which shall be required to discharge the person from imprisonment if an appeal shall be claimed, and shall note the amount upon any mittimus issued upon the sentence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 463; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-3

.

12-22-4.
Giving of recognizance for discharge pending appeal.

Upon a claim of appeal from the sentence of a district court, the appellant, in order to be discharged from immediate imprisonment upon the sentence, shall enter into a recognizance before one of the persons before whom an appeal may be claimed, in the sum fixed by the court, with or without surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the person taking the recognizance, conditioned that the appellant shall appear in the superior court upon the assignment day for the appeal, the exact date of the assignment day to be stated in the recognizance, and whenever his or her appeal is called for trial, and there prosecute the appeal with effect, and abide or perform the order or sentence which the superior court may make or impose in the case, and that he or she will in the meantime keep the peace.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 464; P.L. 1906, ch. 1337, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-4

; P.L. 1967, ch. 85, § 1.

Party Already at Liberty.

This section requiring a recognizance has no application where the party seeking the appeal is already at liberty. Pickett v. Conley,

87 R.I. 21

, 137 A.2d 408,

1958 R.I. LEXIS 1

(1958).

12-22-5.
Commitment pending appeal — Discharge on payment of fine and costs by labor.

Every person claiming an appeal from a sentence of the district court who shall fail to enter into a recognizance in the court or in the office of the clerk of the court appealed from shall upon sentence immediately be committed to the penal institution as sentenced, there to remain until he or she enters into a recognizance as provided in this chapter or is discharged pursuant to law; provided, that in the counties of Newport and Washington any person before removal from the county or division in which sentence is entered may claim an appeal from the sentence of the district court to the superior court by claiming the appeal and entering into recognizance in like manner as required by law before the clerk of the court appealed from, or at the adult correctional institutions, before the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken, or before any of the persons authorized by law to take bail. Whenever an appellant has earned by labor at any penal institution a sum equal to the amount of the fine and costs in the case in which he or she was committed, including all costs accruing at that institution, and has served the full term of imprisonment for which he or she was sentenced, the warden or other person having charge of the institution shall apply with the consent of the appellant the amount so earned by him or her to the settlement of the fines and costs, and the appellant shall then be discharged.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 465; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 5; P.L. 1920, ch. 1936, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 29.

12-22-6.
Forwarding and notice of recognizance to courts — Transmission of papers to superior court.

The person taking a recognizance shall immediately send it to the superior court, and if the recognizance is taken before some person other than a justice or clerk of the court appealed from, notice of the taking of the recognizance shall be certified under the hand of the person to the clerk or a justice of the court appealed from. On notice of a claim of appeal or of the taking of a recognizance, the clerk of the court appealed from shall immediately certify and transmit all the papers in the case to the clerk of the superior court, who shall receipt for the papers.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 466; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 29.

12-22-7.
Assignment day in superior court — Trial by attorney general.

The assignment day for appeals in criminal cases in the superior court shall be the assignment day in that court which occurs next after ten (10) days from the date of the sentence appealed from. All appeals shall be tried by the attorney general, except as otherwise provided.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 467; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-7

.

12-22-8.
Admission of guilt before appellate court.

Whenever any appellant who has been sentenced to pay a fine and costs only, having given recognizance, shall at any time before the assignment day of the appeal appear before the court to which the appeal was taken and plead guilty to the complaint upon which the appeal was taken, or shall admit that the state has sufficient evidence to convict him or her on the complaint, the court shall adjudge him or her guilty of the offense as charged in the complaint, and shall sentence the appellant to pay the same fine that was imposed in the court from which his or her appeal was taken, together with all costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 468; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 8; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-8

.

12-22-9.
Appeals from courts having jurisdiction of ordinance violations.

All appeals from any court having jurisdiction of offenses against town or city ordinances shall be taken and shall proceed according to the provisions of this chapter, and in those appeals the recognizance may be taken by either of the officers or persons designated and authorized to take recognizances.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 470; G.L. 1909, ch. 296, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 346, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 630, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-9

.

12-22-10.
Repealed.

12-22-11.
Failure to prosecute constitutional objection.

If the party raising any certified constitutional question shall fail to appear in the supreme court and prosecute the cause in which the question is raised, the cause shall be remanded to the court from which it was certified, and the court shall then proceed in the same manner as if the question had not been raised; and the question shall not be raised again in the cause.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 476; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-11

.

12-22-12.
Additional bail on motion for new trial or appeal.

Whenever a person convicted of any crime shall file a motion for a new trial or notice of his or her intentions to appeal, the superior court may require the person to give additional bail.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 476; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-11

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 27.

12-22-13.
Errors in pleading.

No judgment, verdict, or decision shall be set aside, reversed, or new trial granted, in any criminal proceedings, for error as to any matter of pleading, unless in the opinion of the supreme court, after an examination of the entire cause, it shall appear that the error complained of has resulted in a miscarriage of justice.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 14; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

12-22-13

.

12-22-14.
Refund of fine and costs.

The superior court, in any criminal case appealed to that court in which the defendant paid his or her fine and costs in the lower court, may, upon application made within three (3) years after a finding of not guilty or the deferring or suspension of sentence, order the amount of the fine and costs to be refunded to the defendant, and in that case the clerk of the superior court shall submit a properly authenticated voucher to the state controller who is authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum. The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it shall deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 128, § 1.